Vermont, session 2025-2026, H281.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 5202a is amended to read:
§ 5202a. CORRECTION, COMPLETION, OR AMENDMENT OF DEATH
CERTIFICATE
* * *
VT LEG #379878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.281
2025 Page 2 of 3
(g) Gender identity. The State Registrar may correct or amend a death
certificate to reflect the deceased person’s gender identity at the time of death,
upon application by:
(1) the certifying licensed health care professional, medical examiner,
hospital, or nursing home; or
(2) the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, sibling, grandparent, or
guardian of the deceased person.
(h) Rules. Pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the Department shall adopt
rules as necessary for the purposes of implementing, administering, or
enforcing the correction or amendment of death certificates pursuant to
subsection (g) of this section. The rules adopted pursuant to this subsection
shall include:
(1) a list of the documents that may be accepted as prima facie evidence
of the deceased person’s gender identity, including any relevant information
contained in an advanced directive;
(2) the forms and affidavits that shall be used to attest to the deceased
person’s identity at the time of death; and
(3) procedures for an individual to file a predesignation of their gender
identity, which may be used by the State Registrar to render a final decision
concerning the correction or amendment of a death certificate.
VT LEG #379878 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.281
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH; RULEMAKING; LEGISLATIVE
INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of Health,
exercising rulemaking authority pursuant to this act, shall adopt a
comprehensive procedure for a health care professional or surviving family
member to attest to the gender identity of a deceased person. The procedure
shall ensure that any conflicting requests for the correction or amendment of
the gender identity on a death certificate are resolved through the consideration
and review of appropriate evidence.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379878 v.1